Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0248.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
Sec. 14t. (1) The low-income water residential affordability
fund is created within the state treasury.
(2) The state treasurer may receive money or other assets from
any source for deposit into the fund. The state treasurer shall
direct the investment of the fund and credit to the fund interest
and earnings from fund investments.
(3) Money in the fund at the close of the fiscal year remains
in the fund and does not lapse to the general fund.
(4) The department of treasury is responsible for collecting
RMH S00890'25 (S-2) gyki24


and auditing related funds.
(5) The department is the administrator of the fund for
auditing purposes. The department shall expend money from the fund,
on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes:
(a) 5% of the fund to the department for administrative costs
of the affordability program. Beginning 3 years after the effective
date of the amendatory act that added this section and once every 3
years thereafter, the department shall evaluate the amount under
this subsection.
(b) $425,000.00 to the department of treasury.
(c) The remaining balance of the fund to providers and program
administrators for the following:
(i) The actual administrative costs associated with the
implementation of the affordability program, not to exceed 15%.
(ii) Payment or advancement to providers and program
administrators for income-based bill discounts, income-based bill
caps, or income-based rates.
(iii) Arrearage payments.
(iv) Water loss mitigation programs administered by third party
organizations such as home plumbing audits and minor plumbing
repairs. The department shall expend not more than $15,000,000.00
for water loss mitigation programs under this subparagraph.
(6) Notwithstanding section 30a of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30a,
payments made to a provider from the fund under subsection (5)(c)
are exempt from interception, execution, levy, attachment,
garnishment, or any other legal process to collect a debt. No
portion of any payment described under subsection (5)(c) must be
applied to offset any liability of the provider under section 30a
of 1941 PA 122, MCL 205.30a, or any other statute.
RMH S00890'25 (S-2) gyki24


(7) The department shall disburse money from the fund to
providers and program administrators on a frequency of not less
than quarterly for the items listed in subsection (5)(c).
(8) Subject to the limitations imposed in this section, the
low-income water residential affordability funding factor is any of
the following amounts:
(a) A fee of $1.25 per month per retail water meter or the
equivalent based on the provider's billing cycle, which increases
by $0.25 annually beginning March 1, 2026, until February 28, 2030.
Beginning March 1, 2030, and by each March 1 thereafter, the
department of treasury shall adjust the funding factor by the
percentage increase in the United States Consumer Price Index for
the immediately preceding calendar year. If the remaining balance
reported by the department of treasury is greater than 10% of the
funds collected by the funding factor in the fiscal year for which
the remaining balance was reported, the department of treasury
shall set the funding factor at a rate at which the total funds
collected would not exceed the total amount of funds collected by
the low-income water affordability funding factor minus the
remaining balance.
(b) If on the effective date of the amendatory act that added
this section the provider operates an assistance or affordability
program, any of the following fees:
(i) A fee of $1.25 per month for each retail water-metered or
flat rate account.
(ii) A fee of $1.25 per month for each retail water-metered or
flat rate account less an amount that is equivalent to the average
monthly amount the customer paid the previous year for the
provider's assistance or affordability program.
RMH S00890'25 (S-2) gyki24


(iii) A fee of $1.25 per month for each retail water-metered
account or flat fee rate less 10% if the provider imposed a fee for
participation in an assistance or affordability program in the
previous year.
(9) The department of treasury may adjust the funding factor
within each of the department's business service center regions.
The task force or the department may recommend to the department of
treasury to reduce the funding factor under subsection (8)(b) if
projections show there is enough in the fund to sustain the
affordability program for 3 years with the reduced funding factor.
(10) The funding factor must not exceed $3.00 or result in
total collections that are 10% greater than the total amount
collected in the previous year, whichever is less.
(11) Any adjustment to the funding factor must be determined
by the department of treasury not later than October 1 and takes
effect on January 1 of the succeeding year.
(12) The affordability funding factor must be considered as
part of the total bill for the purposes of considering water
affordability based on household income caps in the affordability
program or as otherwise outlined in sections 14n to 14s.
(13) Providers shall include the funding factor on all retail
water bills. Providers may list the funding factor as a separate
line item on residential customer bills or incorporate the funding
factor into retail water rates. Payment for services collected by
providers must first be applied to satisfy this subsection and must
be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit into the fund on a
regular cycle that matches the remitting providers' billing cycle
but not later than 30 days after the last day of the billing cycle.
(14) After the first full year of collection, and not later
RMH S00890'25 (S-2) gyki24


than April 1, the provider is required to annually provide to the
department the following information regarding the low-income water
residential affordability funding factor:
(a) The number of retail water-metered accounts within each of
the department's business service center regions and for which a
bill was sent subject to the funding factor on June 30 and December
31 of the previous calendar year.
(b) The total amount of money collected by the provider from
the funding factor.
(c) The total amount of money not collected by the provider
from the funding factor.
(d) The total amount of money remitted by the provider to the
state treasurer from the funding factor.
(e) The total amount of administrative costs associated with
administering or implementing the affordability program.
(15) Money collected from the funding factor within each of
the department's business service center regions must be disbursed
to providers and program administrators within the same business
service center regions.
(16) If a municipality's primary wholesale provider is located
in another business service center region, the municipality is
considered part of the same business service center region as that
wholesale provider, unless the municipality, the department, and
the municipality's primary wholesale provider sign a memorandum of
agreement that states that the municipality is considered to be
located within the business service center region in which the
municipality is geographically located. As used in this subsection,
"wholesale provider" means a provider that supplies water service
or the services of wastewater collection, wastewater treatment,
RMH S00890'25 (S-2) gyki24


stormwater collection, or stormwater treatment to a retail provider
for resale.
(17) Not later than July 1 each year, the task force shall
annually provide a report to the legislature and post that report
on the department's website. The report must include the following:
(a) The information collected under subsection (14).
(b) The total amount of money remitted to each provider.
(c) Any recommended adjustments to the affordability program
or fund.
(d) The total amount of administrative costs associated with
administering or implementing the affordability program.
(18) This section does not give the Michigan public service
commission the power to regulate a public water utility.
(19) The attorney general may enforce this section against a
provider that fails to include the funding factor on all retail
water bills or remit the money collected from the funding factor by
filing a civil action in the circuit court in the county where the
provider does business. Subject to this subsection, a provider is
not subject to liability for the funding factor included on retail
water bills but not collected through the provider's normal
business practices.
(20) The department of treasury shall create a mechanism
through which a retail water customer or philanthropic entity can
donate funds into the fund. Any entity that contributes more than
$5,000.00 shall receive a "water affordability champion"
designation.
(21) This section does not preclude a provider from
establishing other funding mechanisms to supplement its approved
locally administered program.
RMH S00890'25 (S-2) gyki24


Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect
unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are
enacted into law:
(a) Senate Bill No. 249.
(b) Senate Bill No. 250.
(c) Senate Bill No. 251.
(d) Senate Bill No. 252.
Final Page
RMH S00890'25 (S-2) gyki24